AnimYaaNoun.lexc
!!!nouns.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +N +Anim +Inanim +Indef +Nom +Acc +Dat +GenLoc +InstrAbl +Voc +Sg +Pl +Indef ^GUESSSTEMA ^GUESSSTEMAA ^GUESSSTEMC

LEXICON Root
AnimYaaStem;


LEXICON AnimYaaStem

කොටි AnimYaaNoun;
සිංහ AnimYaaNoun;
පරවි AnimYaaNoun;

LEXICON AnimYaaNoun

+N+Acc+Sg+Anim:යා #;
+N+Dat+Indef+Sg:යාට #;
+N+GenLoc+Indef+Sg:යෙක් #;
+N+GenLoc+Indef+Sg:යෙකු #;
+N+Dat+Indef+Sg:යෙකුට #;
+N+Dat+Indef+Sg:යෙකුහට #;
+N+Dat+Indef+Sg:යෙක්ට #;
+N+Dat+Indef+Sg:යෙක්හට #;
+N+GenLoc+Sg+Inanim:යෙකුගේ#;
+N+GenLoc+Sg+Inanim:යෙක්ගේ#;
+N+Acc+Pl+Anim:යෝ#;
+N+Dat+Pl+Anim:යෝට #;
+N+Dat+Pl+Anim:යෝහට #;
+N+Nom+Pl+Anim:යන් #;
+N+Dat+Pl+Inanim:යන්ට #;
+N+Dat+Pl+Inanim:යන්හට #;
+N+GenLoc+Pl+Inanim:යන්ගේ #;
+N+GenLoc+Pl+Anim:යෝගේ #;
+N+GenLoc+Pl+Inanim:යන්ගෙන් #;
+N+GenLoc+Sg+Anim:යාත් #;
+N+GenLoc+Pl+Anim:යෝත් #;
+N+Nom+Indef+Sg:යාම #;
+N+Nom+Indef+Sg:යාවත් #;
+N+Nom+Indef+Pl:යෝවත් #;
